Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1382.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "applicable percent" in section 1602-W of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 1602-W. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable percent." [As](1) For taxable years ending before January 1, 2026, as defined in section 21(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(2) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, as defined in section 21(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025, and ending before January 1, 2027.* * *Section 2. Section 1603-W(c) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1603-W. Credit for child and dependent care employment-related expenses.* * *(c) Amount of tax credit in subsequent taxable years ending before January 1, 2026.--The amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) for taxable years beginning after December 31, 20260SB1382PN1825 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 2022, and [for each taxable year thereafter] ending before January 1, 2026, shall be equal to 100% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(c.1) Amount of tax credit for taxable years after December 31, 2025.--The amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and for each taxable year thereafter, shall be equal to 100% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025, and ending before January 1, 2027.20260SB1382PN1825 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1382PN1825 - 4 - 12